District of Columbia statutes.
1-325.152

Capital Project Support Fund.

(a)

There is established as a special fund the Capital Project Support Fund, which shall be administered by the Chief Financial Officer in accordance with this part.

(b)

All surplus capital funds identified by the Chief Financial Officer pursuant to §§  1-325.153a and 1-325.153b shall be deposited into the Fund.

History

Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 1262, 57 DCR 181
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 8042(b), 62 DCR 10905

Effect of Amendments

The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 rewrote the section.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1042 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-187, August 26, 2009, 56 DCR 7374).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1262 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1262 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 8042(b) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).